Indiana, session 2026, SB194.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-1-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 9.5. Redistricting Standards Relating to Establishing
Legislative Districts
Sec. 1. Except as provided in section 18 of this chapter, districts
created for the house of representatives and the senate must
comply with the standards set forth in this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "federal decennial census" refers
to the federal decennial census conducted under 13 U.S.C. 141.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "house of representatives" refers
to the house of representatives of the general assembly.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "ideal district population" for a
plan refers to the number equal to the quotient of the following,
rounded to the nearest whole number:
(1) The numerator is the population of Indiana as reported by
the most recent federal decennial census.
2026 IN 194—LS 6832/DI 149


(2) The denominator is the number of districts required by
this chapter for the plan.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "plan" refers to either of the
following:
(1) A plan for districts for the house of representatives.
(2) A plan for districts for the senate.
(b) A plan includes maps and written descriptions of the maps
that define all the districts that a plan is required to have under
this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "political subdivision" means a
city, county, town, or township.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "senate" refers to the senate of
the general assembly.
Sec. 8. Except as provided in IC 2-1-9-13, the general assembly
may not establish or modify districts for the house of
representatives or for the senate other than at the first regular
session of the general assembly convening immediately following
the federal decennial census.
Sec. 9. (a) A plan for house of representatives districts must
provide for one hundred (100) districts.
(b) A plan for senate districts must provide for fifty (50)
districts.
Sec. 10. Districts must be established on the basis of population.
Sec. 11. The population of a district of the house of
representatives or the senate may not deviate from the ideal
district population by more than two percent (2%) of the ideal
district population.
Sec. 12. Districts must be as compact as possible to the extent
practicable while considering other provisions of this chapter and
the federal Voting Rights Act.
Sec. 13. (a) Districts must be composed of contiguous territory.
(b) Areas that meet only at the point of adjoining corners are
not considered contiguous.
Sec. 14. Districts must not breach precinct boundaries.
Sec. 15. To the extent possible consistent with sections 10
through 14 of this chapter, district boundaries must seek to
coincide with the boundaries of Indiana political subdivisions as
follows:
(1) The number of counties and cities divided among more
than one (1) district shall be minimized.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), if there is a choice
between political subdivisions to be divided, a more populous
2026 IN 194—LS 6832/DI 149


political subdivision shall be divided before a less populous
political subdivision is divided.
(3) Subdivision (2) does not apply to a district boundary
drawn along a county line that passes through a municipality
that lies in more than one (1) county.
Sec. 16. (a) To the extent practicable, a plan must seek to
minimize the division among more than one (1) district of
geographical areas, such as neighborhoods of a city, public school
corporation attendance districts, or regions of Indiana, where the
residents have common cultural, ethnic, political, or socioeconomic
interests that do not necessarily coincide with the boundaries of a
political subdivision, such as a city or county.
(b) In establishing districts for a plan, consideration must be
given to the effect that the plan has on language minority groups
and racial minority groups as required by the federal Voting
Rights Act.
Sec. 17. (a) In establishing a plan for house of representative
districts, the residential address of an incumbent representative
may not be identified or considered.
(b) In establishing a plan for senate districts, the residential
address of an incumbent senator may not be identified or
considered.
Sec. 18. The initial proposed plans of districts for the house of
representatives and the senate must comply with the standards set
forth in this chapter. However, during the process by which the
initial proposed plans become effective by being enacted as a law
as provided in the Constitution of the State of Indiana, the general
assembly may consider and adopt modifications to the initial
proposed plans that deviate from the standards set forth in this
chapter as long as the reason or reasons for each deviation are
publicly explained and documented.
SECTION 2. IC 3-3-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.133-2021,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This subsection applies only to the first
regular session of the one hundred twenty-second general assembly. If
the general assembly adjourns sine die before November 15, 2021,
without having complied with the requirements of section 1 of this
chapter, a redistricting commission is established. The redistricting
commission consists of the speaker of the house, the president pro tem
of the senate, the chairpersons of the senate and house committees
responsible for legislative apportionment, and a fifth member
appointed by the governor from the membership of the general
2026 IN 194—LS 6832/DI 149


assembly.
(b) (a) This subsection applies to a session of the general assembly
beginning after November 15, 2021. If a session of the general
assembly adjourns without having complied with the requirements of
section 1 of this chapter or if for any other reason at any time the state
finds itself without a valid congressional district law because any
portion of a congressional district in effect is found to be invalid by
a court order, a redistricting commission shall be established which
shall consist of the speaker of the house, the president pro tem of the
senate, the chairman of the senate and house committees responsible
for legislative apportionment and a fifth member who shall be
appointed by the governor from the membership of the general
assembly.
(c) (b) The redistricting commission shall meet within thirty (30)
days after adjournment of the general assembly at a time and place
designated by the president pro tem of the senate and shall adopt a
congressional redistricting plan in accordance with this chapter.
(d) (c) Any plan so adopted shall be signed by a majority of the
redistricting committee and submitted to the governor who forthwith
shall issue and publish the governor's executive order establishing
congressional districts in accordance with the plan so adopted and
directing the commission to place such congressional districts in effect
for the primary and general elections next succeeding such general
assembly. Congressional Except as provided in subsection (d),
congressional districts so established shall continue in effect until
changed by statute. the congressional districts may be established
under section 1 of this chapter.
(d) The provisions of a congressional redistricting plan are
severable as provided in IC 1-1-1-8(b). If:
(1) any portion of a congressional redistricting plan; or
(2) application of any portion of a congressional redistricting
plan to any person or circumstance;
is found to be invalid by a court, the invalidity does not affect the
remaining portions or applications of the congressional
redistricting plan, including the remaining districts, that can be
given effect without the invalid portions, applications, or districts.
(e) The general assembly reserves the right to replace any
congressional redistricting plan mandated by a court immediately,
if in session or, if not in session, in a special session or the next
regular session, whichever comes first.
SECTION 3. IC 3-3-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 194—LS 6832/DI 149


1, 2026]:
Chapter 4.5. Redistricting Standards Relating to Establishing
Congressional Districts
Sec. 1. Except as provided in section 16 of this chapter, districts
created for the United States House of Representatives must
comply with the standards of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "federal decennial census" refers
to the federal decennial census conducted under 13 U.S.C. 141.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "ideal district population" for a
plan refers to the number equal to the quotient of the following,
rounded to the nearest whole number:
(1) The numerator is the population of Indiana as reported by
the most recent federal decennial census.
(2) The denominator is the number of districts required by
this chapter for the plan.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "plan" refers to a plan for
congressional districts.
(b) A plan includes maps and written descriptions of the maps
that define all the districts that a plan is required to have under
this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "political subdivision" means a
city, county, town, or township.
Sec. 6. A plan for congressional districts must provide for as
many districts as are allocated to Indiana under 2 U.S.C. 2a.
Sec. 7. Except as provided in IC 3-3-2-2, the general assembly
may not establish or modify congressional districts other than at
the first regular session of the general assembly convening
immediately following the federal decennial census.
Sec. 8. Districts must be established on the basis of population.
Sec. 9. The population of a district must be as equal as
practicable to the ideal district population.
Sec. 10. Districts must be as compact as possible to the extent
practicable while considering other provisions of this chapter and
the federal Voting Rights Act.
Sec. 11. (a) Districts must be composed of contiguous territory.
(b) Areas that meet only at the point of adjoining corners are
not considered contiguous.
Sec. 12. Districts must not breach precinct boundaries.
Sec. 13. To the extent possible consistent with sections 8 through
12 of this chapter, district boundaries must seek to coincide with
the boundaries of Indiana political subdivisions as follows:
(1) The number of counties and cities divided among more
2026 IN 194—LS 6832/DI 149


than one (1) district shall be minimized.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), if there is a choice
between political subdivisions to be divided, a more populous
political subdivision shall be divided before a less populous
political subdivision is divided.
(3) Subdivision (2) does not apply to a district boundary
drawn along a county line that passes through a municipality
that lies in more than one (1) county.
Sec. 14. (a) To the extent practicable, a plan must seek to
minimize the division among more than one (1) district of
geographical areas, such as neighborhoods of a city, public school
corporation attendance districts, or regions of Indiana, where the
residents have common cultural, ethnic, political, or socioeconomic
interests that do not necessarily coincide with the boundaries of a
political subdivision, such as a city or county.
(b) In establishing districts for a plan, consideration must be
given to the effect that the plan has on language minority groups
and racial minority groups as required by the federal Voting
Rights Act.
Sec. 15. In establishing a plan for congressional districts, the
residential address of an incumbent United States Representative
may not be identified or considered.
Sec. 16. The initial proposed plan for congressional districts
must comply with the standards set forth in this chapter. However,
during the process by which the initial proposed plans become
effective by being enacted as a law as provided by IC 3-3-2-1, the
general assembly may consider and adopt modifications to the
initial proposed plans that deviate from the standards set forth in
this chapter as long as the reason or reasons for each deviation are
publicly explained and documented.
2026 IN 194—LS 6832/DI 149